Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2845.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SOUTHEAST REGIONAL GROUNDWATER PROTECTION AND SOIL HEALTH INITIATIVE.new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of agriculture for grants to soil and water conservation districts in the counties of Dodge, Fillmore, Freeborn, Goodhue, Houston, Mower, Olmsted, Rice, Steele, Wabasha, and Winona to reduce leaching of excess crop nutrients into groundwater, immobilize unused nitrogen from the rooting zone, and reduce erosion as part of a new southeast regional groundwater protection and soil health initiative. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding any provision of Minnesota Statutes, section 17.134, to the contrary, a soil and water conservation district that receives a grant under this section may use the grant to make subgrants for projects that conform to the requirements and limitations of the Olmsted County groundwater protection and soil health initiative, including a cover crop program, alternative crops program, and a haying, grazing, and pasture enhancement program. new text end